apertium-pl-cs.cs.dix
    <pardef n="muž__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ů</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ům</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ích</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nebes/a__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ům</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ích</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="moř/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ím</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ích</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lůž/ko__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ko</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ek</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kům</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ko</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ko</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cích</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kem</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="bachař"><i>bachař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bakalář"><i>bakalář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bankéř"><i>bankéř</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bednář"><i>bednář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boháč"><i>boháč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="brankář"><p><l>brankař</l><r>brankář</r></p><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brankář"><i>brankář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="běžkař"><i>běžkař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knírač"><i>knírač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koncesionář"><i>koncesionář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roháč"><i>roháč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="řidič"><i>řidič</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cestář"><i>cestář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dědic"><i>dědic</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="emisař"><p><l>emisar</l><r>emisař</r></p><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emisař"><i>emisař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="farmář"><i>farmář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="farář"><i>farář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="funkcionář"><i>funkcionář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hasič"><i>hasič</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hlaváč"><i>hlaváč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hledač"><i>hledač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hlídač"><i>hlídač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hodnostář"><i>hodnostář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="honič"><i>honič</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hráč"><i>hráč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvězdář"><i>hvězdář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jachtař"><i>jachtař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jmenovatel"><i>jmenovatel</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kajakář"><i>kajakář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kancléř"><i>kancléř</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kapsář"><i>kapsář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klempíř"><i>klempíř</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komisař"><i>komisař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kouč"><i>kouč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kovář"><i>kovář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krčmář"><i>krčmář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuchař"><i>kuchař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lamač"><i>lamač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lhář"><i>lhář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lékař"><i>lékař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lůžko"><i>lůž</i><par n="lůž/ko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="makléř"><i>makléř</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="malíř"><i>malíř</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mestic"><i>mestic</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="milionář"><i>milionář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="misionář"><i>misionář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moře"><i>moř</i><par n="moř/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mudrc"><i>mudrc</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muž"><i>muž</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="měkkýš"><i>měkkýš</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nebe"><i>neb</i><par n="moř/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nebesa"><i>nebes</i><par n="nebes/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="notář"><i>notář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="novinář"><i>novinář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="návrhář"><i>návrhář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oráč"><i>oráč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ostřelovač"><i>ostřelovač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pastýř"><i>pastýř</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pivař"><i>pivař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potápěč"><i>potápěč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="povaleč"><i>povaleč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="počítač"><i>počítač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primář"><i>primář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="proletář"><i>proletář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="přenašeč"><i>přenašeč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="revolucionář"><i>revolucionář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rybář"><i>rybář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rytíř"><i>rytíř</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sekretář"><i>sekretář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="signatář"><i>signatář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="silničář"><i>silničář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sklář"><i>sklář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slunce"><i>slunc</i><par n="moř/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sochař"><i>sochař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soupeř"><i>soupeř</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stopař"><i>stopař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strýc"><i>strýc</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sázkař"><i>sázkař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taxikář"><i>taxikář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="templář"><i>templář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tiskař"><i>tiskař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="truhlář"><i>truhlář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udavač"><i>udavač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="udavač"><p><l>udávač</l><r>udavač</r></p><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veterinář"><i>veterinář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vikář"><i>vikář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vladař"><i>vladař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vodnář"><i>vodnář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="vyhledávač"><p><l>vyhledavač</l><r>vyhledávač</r></p><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vyhledávač"><i>vyhledávač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vypravěč"><i>vypravěč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vyznavač"><i>vyznavač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vzpěrač"><i>vzpěrač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zahrádkář"><i>zahrádkář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zaměřovač"><i>zaměřovač</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="četař"><i>četař</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čtenář"><i>čtenář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žhář"><i>žhář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hladovkář"><i>hladovkář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kobáč"><i>kobáč</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protonotář"><i>protonotář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uzenář"><i>uzenář</i><par n="muž__n"/></e>
